Hawaii statutes.
§532-9 Posthumous children. Posthumous
children shall, in all cases, inherit the same as if they had been born during
their father's lifetime. [CC 1859, §1456; RL 1925, §3310; RL 1935, §4818; RL
1945, §12078; RL 1955, §318-9; HRS §532-9]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next